runtime/dict/uk_UA.dic
Балаклицький/Fga
Баптизманський/Fga
Башинський/Fga
безпосажна/Fa
Бендаржевський/Fga
Берлинський/Fga
Бєльський/Fga
Білецький/Fga
Біляшівський/Fga
Бобринський/Fga
Богуславський/Fga
Боровий/Fga
Боярський/Fga
Будьонний/Fga
бургерна/Fa
Бучковський/Fga
в'їстися/_
в'їхати/_
ванна/&<Fa
Васильковський/Fga
вбрести/_
ввести/_>
ввестися/_
ввійти/_
вгнати/_
вгнатися/_
ведучий/mFga
Вербицький/Fga
Верховський/Fga
вибрести/_
вивести/_>
вивестися/_
Вигівський/Fga
вигнати/_(
вигнатися/_
вижати/`n
вижатися/`
виїхати/_
вийти/_
викласти/_>
викластися/_
викрастися/_
винайти/_O
винайтися/_
Виноградівський/Fga
випасти/_[O
виплисти/_
виповісти/_
випрясти/_>
випрястися/_
вихідний/mFa
від'їсти/_
від'їстися/_
від'їхати/_
відвестися/_
відкласти/_>
відкрастися/_
віднайтися/_
відплисти/_
відпрясти/_
Вієльгорський/Fga
Вільхівський/Fga
Вірський/Fga
вкрасти/_>
возний/Fa
Волковецький/Fga
Вольський/Fga
впасти/[_
вповісти/_
Вронський/Fga
Гаєцький/Fga
Гальчинський/Fga
Гвоздецький/Fga
Гливінський/Fga
Годлевський/Fga
голомозий/mFa
Горбовий/Fga
Городиський/Fga
Грабовецький/Fga
гримерна/Fa
Грохольський/Fga
Губський/Fga
Гусинський/Fga
Даргомижський/Fga
Делімарський/Fga
Демуцький/Fga
Джуринський/Fga
дібратися/_
Дідківський/Fga
дійти/_O
дійтися/_
Добровольський/Fga
догнати/_
дожати/`n
дожатися/`
доїхати/_
докрасти/_
Долинський/Fga
допастися/[_
доплисти/_
дорозкрасти/_>
Досвітній/Fga
Дронський/Fga
Дубровний/Fga
ексведучий/Fa
Жамбровський/Fga
жати/`|n
жатися/`
Жеромський/Fga
Жолкевський/Fga
Журомський/Fga
з'їхати/_
забрести/_
Завадський/Fga
завестися/_
загнатися/_
Загорський/Fga
зажати/`
Заінчковський/Fga
заїстися/_
зайти/_
закласти/_>
закрастися/_
Заліський/Fga
запасти/_[O
заплисти/_
Заполовський/Fga
запопастися/_
запрясти/_
Зарубінський/Fga
затриманий/mFga
Зборовський/Fga
збрести/_
Згурський/Fga
зійти/_
злотий/Fa
знайти/_O
зодчий/Fa
Іванський/Fga
Іскрицький/Fga
іти/_|
їхати/_|
Казановський/Fga
Каменський/Fga
Капустянський/Fga
Карпінський/Fga
Качуровський/Fga
Кислий/Fga
Кістяківський/Fga
Кобилінський/Fga
Козерацький/Fga
Колосовський/Fga
Коморовський/Fga
конюшний/mFa
Коропецький/Fga
Косинський/Fga
Котелевський/Fga
Кошовий/Fga
Кривенький/Fga
Крупський/Fga
курінний/mFa
Лавський/Fga
Левандовський/Fga
Липківський/Fga
лісничий/Fa
Луговський/Fga
Лясковський/Fga
Мальований/Fga
Матковський/Fga
Милославський/Fga
Мозговий/Fga
Мошенський/Fga
набрести/_
навестися/_
нагнатися/_
надвести/_>
надплисти/_
нажати/`n
нажатися/`
наїсти/_
наїхати/_
найтися/_
Наконечний/Fga
накрасти/_>
напасти/[_
наплисти/_
Недашковський/Fga
недібрати/_(
недокласти/_>
недорозповісти/_
нещасний/m,Fga
об'їстися/_
обвестися/_
обвинувачуваний/mFga
обжати/_n`
обійти/_O
обікласти/`>
обікластися/`
обікрасти/`>
обкласти/_>
обпасти/_
одвести/_>
одповісти/_
Омеляновський/Fga
опасти/_
оповісти/_
Осовський/Fga
палубничий/Fa
перебрести/_
перевестися/_
перевідкласти/_>
перегнати/_(
пережати/`n
переїстися/_
перейти/_O
перекластися/_
перепастися/_
переповісти/_
перепрясти/_>
перескластися/_
перехожий/Fga
Пироговський/Fga
під'їсти/_
підвести/_>
Підгорський/Fga
підійти/_
підкрастися/_
підозрюваний/mFga
підплисти/_
піти/_
Плахотний/Fga
побрести/_
повестися/_
погнати/_(
Подлєсний/Fga
пожати/`n
поїсти/_>
поїхати/_
покрасти/_>
полонений/mFga
понакласти/_>
попастися/[_
попоїсти/_
попрясти/_>
поранений/mFga
Похмурський/Fga
привестися/_
пригнатися/_
приїхати/_
прийтися/_
прикластися/_
припасти/[O_
приплисти/_
приповістися/_
пристяжний/mFa
пробрести/_
прогнати/_(
проіржати/_
проїстися/_
проїхатися/_
пройтися/_
прокластися/_
пропасти/_
пропрясти/_
псевдокрива/Fa
радіоведучий/Fga
Рашевський/Fga
Роговий/Fga
роз'їстися/_
розбрестися/_
розійтися/_
розікласти/`
розікластися/`
розікрасти/`>
розкластися/_
розпастися/[_
розповісти/_
Рудьковський/Fga
рукопокласти/_
Савранський/Fga
Світлицький/Fga
Синицький/Fga
скластися/_
Скоропадський/Fga
Смолинський/Fga
Сохацький/Fga
спасти/_[
сплисти/_
спопасти/_
Станішевський/Fga
Столярський/Fga
сухотний/mFga
Теодоровський/Fga
Топачевський/Fga
Тульчинський/Fga
убрести/_
увійти/_
уїсти/_
укласти/_>
украстися/_
умирущий/mFga
уплисти/_
Хвильовий/Fga
Хомський/Fga
Црвенковський/Fga
Червінський/Fga
Чорний/Fga
Шатковський/Fga
Шовкошитний/Fga
юродивий/mFa
Янковський/Fga
